South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5617.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 17-13-150 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 17-13-150. When anya person is served with a search warrant, such person shallmust be furnished with a copy of the warrant along with the affidavit upon which such warrant was issued. If a copy of the inventory is demanded by the person from whose person or premises property is taken, a copy of the inventory must be provided to him. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----